Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-3518
Responsible charge, defined.

Responsible charge means personal responsibility for the technical and financial aspects of geologic work through:

(1) Personal action;

(2) Management in an organization; or

(3) Direct supervision.

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 66;

Laws 2025, LB38, § 15.